Maine, session 132, LD1082.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 36 MRSA §4641-A, sub-§1, ¶A, as enacted by PL 2001, c. 559, Pt. I, §3
and affected by §15, is amended to read:
A. The rate of the tax is $2.20 for each $500 or fractional part of $500 of the value of
the property transferred, if the value is less than $1,000,000, and the rate of the tax is
$5.00 for each $500 or fractional part of $500 of the value of the property transferred,
if the value is $1,000,000 or greater.
Sec. 2. 36 MRSA §4641-A, sub-§2, ¶A, as enacted by PL 2001, c. 559, Pt. I, §3
and affected by §15, is amended to read:
A. The rate of the tax is $2.20 for each $500 or fractional part of $500 of the value of
the real property, if the value is less than $1,000,000, owned by the entity and located
in this State and the rate of the tax is $5.00 for each $500 or fractional part of $500 of
the value of the real property, if the value is $1,000,000 or greater.
Sec. 3. 36 MRSA §4641-B, sub-§4-B, ¶E-1, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 412, Pt.
AAAA, §3, is amended to read:
E-1. In fiscal year 2025-26 and each fiscal year thereafter, the Treasurer of State shall
credit the revenues derived from the tax imposed pursuant to section 4641‑A,
subsection 1 in accordance with this paragraph.
(1) At the beginning of the fiscal year, the Maine State Housing Authority shall
certify to the Treasurer of State the amount that is necessary and sufficient to meet
the authority's obligations relating to bonds issued or planned to be issued by the
authority under Title 30‑A, section 4864.
(2) On a monthly basis, the Treasurer of State shall apply 50% of the revenues in
accordance with this subparagraph. The Treasurer of State shall first pay revenues
available under this subparagraph to the Maine State Housing Authority, which
shall deposit the funds in the Maine Energy, Housing and Economic Recovery
Fund established in Title 30‑A, section 4863, until the amount paid equals the
amount certified by the Maine State Housing Authority under subparagraph (1),
after which the Treasurer of State shall credit 1/2 of any remaining revenues
available under this subparagraph to the General Fund and 1/2 of any remaining
revenues available under this subparagraph to the Housing First Fund established
in Title 22, section 20‑A, subsection 2.
(3) On a monthly basis, the Treasurer of State shall credit 50% of the revenues to
the Maine State Housing Authority. The Maine State Housing Authority shall
deposit the funds received pursuant to this subparagraph in the Housing
Opportunities for Maine Fund created in Title 30‑A, section 4853. Beginning July
1, 2025, the Maine State Housing Authority shall use 25% of funds transferred to
the Housing Opportunities for Maine Fund under this subparagraph to support the
creation of new housing units, through new construction or adaptive reuse, that are
affordable to low-income households.
Sec. 4. 36 MRSA §4641-B, sub-§4-B, ¶E-2 is enacted to read:
Page 1 - 132LR0365(01)

E-2. In fiscal year 2026-27 and each fiscal year thereafter, the Treasurer of State shall
credit the revenues derived from the tax imposed pursuant to section 4641-A,
subsection 1 in accordance with this paragraph.
(1) At the beginning of the fiscal year, the Maine State Housing Authority shall
certify to the Treasurer of State the amount that is necessary and sufficient to meet
the authority's obligations relating to bonds issued or planned to be issued by the
authority under Title 30‑A, section 4864.
(2) After reducing the revenue amount by the amount certified pursuant to
subparagraph (1), on a monthly basis, the Treasurer of State shall apply 17% of the
remaining revenues in accordance with this subparagraph. The Treasurer of State
shall pay revenues available under this subparagraph to the Department of Health
and Human Services, which shall deposit the funds in the Housing First Fund
established pursuant to Title 22, section 20-A.
(3) After applying revenues pursuant to subparagraph (2), on a monthly basis, the
Treasurer of State shall apply 15% of the remaining revenues in accordance with
this subparagraph. The Treasurer of State shall pay revenues available under this
subparagraph to the Maine State Housing Authority, which shall deposit the funds
in the Housing Opportunities for Maine Fund created in Title 30-A, section 4853.
(4) After applying revenues pursuant to subparagraph (3), on a monthly basis, the
Treasurer of State shall apply 60% of the remaining revenues in accordance with
this subparagraph. The Treasurer of State shall pay revenues available under this
subparagraph to the Maine State Housing Authority, which shall apply the funds
to the affordable housing income tax credit established pursuant to section
5219-WW and the authority's rural affordable rental program and affordable
homeownership program.
(5) After applying revenues pursuant to subparagraph (4), on a monthly basis, the
Treasurer of State shall apply the remaining balance of the revenues in accordance
with this subparagraph. The Treasurer of State shall deposit the funds in the
General Fund.
Sec. 5. 36 MRSA §4641-C, sub-§20, as amended by PL 2017, c. 402, Pt. E, §3
and affected by PL 2019, c. 417, Pt. B, §14, is further amended to read:
20. Controlling interests. Transfers of controlling interests in an entity with a fee
interest in real property if the transfer of the real property would qualify for exemption if
accomplished by deed of the real property between the parties to the transfer of the
controlling interest; and
Sec. 6. 36 MRSA §4641-C, sub-§21, as enacted by PL 2017, c. 402, Pt. E, §4 and
affected by PL 2019, c. 417, Pt. B, §14, is amended to read:
21. Transfers pursuant to transfer on death deed. Any transfer of real property
effectuated by a transfer on death deed pursuant to Title 18‑C, Article 6, Part 4.; and
Sec. 7. 36 MRSA §4641-C, sub-§22 is enacted to read:
22. First-time home buyers participating in certain mortgage loan programs.
Deeds to property to purchasers who receive financial assistance through the Maine State
Housing Authority's first-time home-buyer mortgage loan programs.
Page 2 - 132LR0365(01)